Hawaii statutes.
§321-92 Fees for services. The
department of health is authorized to establish, charge, and collect reasonable
fees for services rendered under the program set forth in section 321-91. [L
1966, c 23, pt of §2; HRS §321-92]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next